th: หมวดหมู่ขนาดผู้เล่น: ผู้ใหญ่; ระดับกลาง; ทีบอล; เยาวชน; อื่นๆ
fi: Pelaajan kokoluokka: Aikuinen; Keskitaso; Tee Ball; Nuoriso; Muu
hu: Játékos méret kategóriája: Felnőtt; Köztes; Tee ball; Ifjúsági; Egyéb
ja: プレイヤーサイズカテゴリー: 大人; インターメディエイト; ティーボール; ユース; その他
es: Categoría de talla del jugador: Adultos; Intermedios; Tee Ball; Jóvenes; Otro
de: Altersklasse: Erwachsene; Intermediate; Tee Ball; Jugend; Sonstige
nl: Categorie spelersgrootte: Volwassene; Gemiddeld; Tee Ball; Jeugd; Overig
tr: Oyuncu beden kategorisi: Yetişkin; Orta seviye; Tee Ball; Genç; Diğer
bg-BG: Категория размер на играча: За възрастни; Междинен размер; Тийбол; За младежи; Други
pl: Kategoria rozmiaru odtwarzacza: Dla dorosłych; Dla zaawansowanych; Tee ball; Młodzieżowy; Inny
it: Categoria di taglia del giocatore: Adulto; Intermedio; Tee-ball; Ragazzi; Altro
fr: Catégorie de taille des joueurs: Adulte; Intermédiaire; Tee-ball; Jeunes; Autre
el: Κατηγορία μεγέθους πλακέτας: Ενήλικες; Ενδιάμεσο; Tee Ball; Νέοι; Άλλο
sv: Spelarstorlekskategori: Vuxen; Mellan; Teeball; Ungdom; Övrigt
zh-TW: 玩家尺寸分類: 成人; 中級; 樂樂棒球; 青少年; 其他
ro-RO: Categoria de dimensiune a jucătorului: Adult; Intermediar; Tee ball; Tineret; Altele
hr-HR: Kategorija veličine igrača: Za odrasle; Srednje; Tee Ball; Za mlade; Ostalo
pt-BR: Jogador, categoria de tamanho: Adulto; Intermediário; Tee Ball; Juvenil; Outro
cs: Kategorie velikosti hráče: Pro dospělé; Pokročilé; Tee ball; Pro mládež; Jiné
en: Player size category: Adult; Intermediate; Tee Ball; Youth; Other
ru: Размерная категория игрока: Взрослая; Переходная; Тибол; Юношеская; Другое
nb: Størrelseskategori for spiller: Voksen; Mellomnivå; T-ball; Ungdom; Annet
ko: 플레이어 사이즈 범주: 성인용; 중급자용; 티볼; 유소년용; 기타
vi: Nhóm kích cỡ theo người chơi: Người lớn; Trung bình; Tee Ball; Thanh thiếu niên; Khác
sl-SI: Kategorija velikosti igralca: Odrasli; Vmesna velikost; Tee Ball; Mladina; Drugo
da: Størrelseskategori for spiller: Voksen; Mellemniveau; Tee-ball; Børn/unge; Andet
sk-SK: Kategória veľkostí hráča: Dospelí; Strední; Tee Ball; Mládež; Iné
pt-PT: Categoria de tamanho do atleta: Adultos; Intermédio; Tee ball; Jovens; Outro
lt-LT: Žaidėjo dydžio kategorija: Suaugusiųjų; Tarpinis; Tee Ball; Jaunimo; Kita
zh-CN: 球员尺码类别: 成人; 中级; 乐乐棒球; 青年; 其他